Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6113
Name.

If the name of a mutual insurer converting to a stock insurer pursuant to the Insurers Demutualization Act includes the word mutual, the new stock insurer may continue to use the word mutual in its name if (1) the name includes a word or words that identify the new stock insurer as a stock insurer and (2) the director finds that the continued use of the word mutual in its name is not likely to mislead or deceive the public.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 53.